Illinois, session 104th, SB2987.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 1-17 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/1-17)7    Sec. 1-17. Inspector General.8    (a) Nature and purpose. It is the express intent of the 9General Assembly to ensure the health, safety, and financial 10condition of individuals receiving services in this State due 11to mental illness, developmental disability, or both by 12protecting those persons from acts of abuse, neglect, or both 13by service providers. To that end, the Office of the Inspector 14General for the Department of Human Services is created to 15investigate and report upon allegations of the abuse, neglect, 16or financial exploitation of individuals receiving services 17within mental health facilities, developmental disabilities 18facilities, and community agencies operated, licensed, funded, 19or certified by the Department of Human Services, but not 20licensed or certified by any other State agency.21    (b) Definitions. The following definitions apply to this 22Section:23    "Agency" or "community agency" means (i) a community   SB2987- 2 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1agency licensed, funded, or certified by the Department, but 2not licensed or certified by any other human services agency 3of the State, to provide mental health service or 4developmental disabilities service, or (ii) a program 5licensed, funded, or certified by the Department, but not 6licensed or certified by any other human services agency of 7the State, to provide mental health service or developmental 8disabilities service.9    "Aggravating circumstance" means a factor that is 10attendant to a finding and that tends to compound or increase 11the culpability of the accused.12    "Allegation" means an assertion, complaint, suspicion, or 13incident involving any of the following conduct by an 14employee, facility, or agency against an individual or 15individuals: mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse, 16neglect, financial exploitation, or material obstruction of an 17investigation.18    "Day" means working day, unless otherwise specified.19    "Deflection" means a situation in which an individual is 20presented for admission to a facility or agency, and the 21facility staff or agency staff do not admit the individual. 22"Deflection" includes triage, redirection, and denial of 23admission.24    "Department" means the Department of Human Services. 25    "Developmental disability" means "developmental 26disability" as defined in the Mental Health and Developmental   SB2987- 3 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1Disabilities Code.2    "Egregious neglect" means a finding of neglect as 3determined by the Inspector General that (i) represents a 4gross failure to adequately provide for, or a callous callused 5indifference to, the health, safety, or medical needs of an 6individual and (ii) results in an individual's death or other 7serious deterioration of an individual's physical condition or 8mental condition.9    "Employee" means any person who provides services at the 10facility or agency on-site or off-site. The service 11relationship can be with the individual or with the facility 12or agency. Also, "employee" includes any employee or 13contractual agent of the Department of Human Services or the 14community agency involved in providing or monitoring or 15administering mental health or developmental disability 16services. This includes but is not limited to: owners, 17operators, payroll personnel, contractors, subcontractors, and 18volunteers.19    "Facility" or "State-operated facility" means a mental 20health facility or developmental disabilities facility 21operated by the Department.22    "Financial exploitation" means taking unjust advantage of 23an individual's assets, property, or financial resources 24through deception, intimidation, or conversion for the 25employee's, facility's, or agency's own advantage or benefit.26    "Finding" means the Office of Inspector General's   SB2987- 4 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1determination regarding whether an allegation is 2substantiated, unsubstantiated, or unfounded.3    "Health Care Worker Registry" or "Registry" means the 4Health Care Worker Registry under the Health Care Worker 5Background Check Act.6    "Individual" means any person receiving mental health 7service, developmental disabilities service, or both from a 8facility or agency, while either on-site or off-site.9    "Material obstruction of an investigation" means the 10intentional failure to timely report an allegation to the 11hotline or the purposeful interference with an investigation 12of physical abuse, sexual abuse, mental abuse, neglect, or 13financial exploitation for the purpose of obstructing an 14Office of the Inspector General investigation. This may 15include and includes, but is not limited to, delaying or 16withholding reports of allegations to the hotline for the 17purpose of obstructing an Office of the Inspector General 18investigation; the withholding or altering of documentation or 19recorded evidence when reporting an allegation to the hotline 20or during an investigation; influencing, threatening, or 21impeding a victim's, complainant's, or required reporter's 22report of an allegation to the hotline or witness testimony 23during an investigation; presenting untruthful information to 24the hotline or during an investigatory interview; or failing 25to cooperate with an investigation conducted by the Office of 26the Inspector General. Violation of paragraph (2) of   SB2987- 5 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1subsection (i) may also result in a finding of material 2obstruction of an investigation. If an employee, following a 3criminal investigation of physical abuse, sexual abuse, mental 4abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation, is convicted of an 5offense that is factually predicated on the employee 6presenting untruthful information during the course of the 7investigation, that offense constitutes obstruction of an 8investigation. Obstruction of an investigation does not 9include: an employee's lawful exercising of his or her 10constitutional right against self-incrimination, an employee 11invoking his or her lawful rights to union representation as 12provided by a collective bargaining agreement or the Illinois 13Public Labor Relations Act, or a union representative's lawful 14activities providing representation under a collective 15bargaining agreement or the Illinois Public Labor Relations 16Act. Obstruction of an investigation is considered material 17when it could significantly impair the Office of the Inspector 18General's an investigator's ability to gather all relevant 19facts. An employee shall not be placed on the Health Care 20Worker Registry for presenting untruthful information during 21an interview conducted by the Office of the Inspector General, 22unless, prior to the interview, the employee was provided with 23any previous signed statements he or she made during the 24course of the investigation. 25    "Mental abuse" means the use of demeaning, intimidating, 26or threatening words, signs, gestures, or other actions by an   SB2987- 6 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1employee about an individual and in the presence of an 2individual or individuals that results in emotional distress 3or maladaptive behavior, or could have resulted in emotional 4distress or maladaptive behavior, for any individual present.5    "Mental illness" means "mental illness" as defined in the 6Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code.7    "Mentally ill" means having a mental illness. 8    "Mitigating circumstance" means a condition that (i) is 9attendant to a finding, (ii) does not excuse or justify the 10conduct in question, but (iii) may be considered in evaluating 11the severity of the conduct, the culpability of the accused, 12or both the severity of the conduct and the culpability of the 13accused.14    "Neglect" means an employee's, agency's, or facility's 15failure to provide adequate medical care, personal care, or 16maintenance and that, as a consequence, (i) causes an 17individual pain, injury, or emotional distress, (ii) results 18in either an individual's maladaptive behavior or the 19deterioration of an individual's physical condition or mental 20condition, or (iii) places the individual's health or safety 21at substantial risk.22    "Person with a developmental disability" means a person 23having a developmental disability.24    "Physical abuse" means an employee's non-accidental and 25inappropriate contact with an individual that causes bodily 26harm. "Physical abuse" includes actions that cause bodily harm   SB2987- 7 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1as a result of an employee directing an individual or person to 2physically abuse another individual.3    "Presenting untruthful information" means making a false 4statement, material to the report of an allegation to the 5hotline or during an investigation of physical abuse, sexual 6abuse, mental abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation, 7knowing the statement is false. 8    "Recommendation" means an admonition, separate from a 9finding, that requires action by the facility, agency, or 10Department to correct a systemic issue, problem, or deficiency 11identified during an investigation. "Recommendation" can also 12mean an admonition to correct a systemic issue, problem or 13deficiency during a review. 14    "Required reporter" means any employee who suspects, 15witnesses, or is informed of an allegation of any one or more 16of the following: mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse, 17neglect, or financial exploitation.18    "Secretary" means the Chief Administrative Officer of the 19Department.20    "Sexual abuse" means any sexual contact or intimate 21physical contact between an employee and an individual, 22including an employee's coercion or encouragement of an 23individual to engage in sexual behavior that results in sexual 24contact, intimate physical contact, sexual behavior, or 25intimate physical behavior. Sexual abuse also includes (i) an 26employee's actions that result in the sending or showing of   SB2987- 8 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1sexually explicit images to an individual via computer, 2cellular phone, electronic mail, portable electronic device, 3or other media with or without contact with the individual or 4(ii) an employee's posting of sexually explicit images of an 5individual online or elsewhere whether or not there is contact 6with the individual.7    "Sexually explicit images" includes, but is not limited 8to, any material which depicts nudity, sexual conduct, or 9sado-masochistic abuse, or which contains explicit and 10detailed verbal descriptions or narrative accounts of sexual 11excitement, sexual conduct, or sado-masochistic abuse.12    "Substantiated" means there is a preponderance of the 13evidence to support the allegation.14    "Unfounded" means there is no credible evidence to support 15the allegation.16    "Unsubstantiated" means there is credible evidence, but 17less than a preponderance of evidence to support the 18allegation. 19    (c) Appointment. The Governor shall appoint, and the 20Senate shall confirm, an Inspector General. The Inspector 21General shall be appointed for a term of 4 years and shall 22function within the Department of Human Services and report to 23the Secretary and the Governor. 24    (d) Operation and appropriation. The Inspector General 25shall function independently within the Department with 26respect to the operations of the Office, including the   SB2987- 9 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1performance of investigations and issuance of findings and 2recommendations and the performance of site visits and reviews 3of facilities and community agencies. The appropriation for 4the Office of Inspector General shall be separate from the 5overall appropriation for the Department.6    (e) Powers and duties. The Inspector General shall 7investigate reports of suspected mental abuse, physical abuse, 8sexual abuse, neglect, or financial exploitation of 9individuals in any mental health or developmental disabilities 10facility or agency and shall have authority to take immediate 11action to prevent any one or more of the following from 12happening to individuals under its jurisdiction: mental abuse, 13physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, or financial 14exploitation. The Inspector General shall also investigate 15allegations of material obstruction of an investigation by an 16employee. Upon written request of an agency of this State, the 17Inspector General may assist another agency of the State in 18investigating reports of the abuse, neglect, or abuse and 19neglect of persons with mental illness, persons with 20developmental disabilities, or persons with both. The 21Inspector General shall conduct annual site visits of each 22facility and may conduct reviews of facilities and community 23agencies. To comply with the requirements of subsection (k) of 24this Section, the Inspector General shall also review all 25reportable deaths for which there is no allegation of abuse or 26neglect. Nothing in this Section shall preempt any duties of   SB2987- 10 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1the Medical Review Board set forth in the Mental Health and 2Developmental Disabilities Code. The Inspector General shall 3have no authority to investigate alleged violations of the 4State Officials and Employees Ethics Act. Allegations of 5misconduct under the State Officials and Employees Ethics Act 6shall be referred to the Office of the Governor's Executive 7Inspector General for investigation.8    (f) Limitations. The Inspector General shall not conduct 9an investigation within an agency or facility if that 10investigation would be redundant to or interfere with an 11investigation conducted by another State agency. The Inspector 12General shall have no supervision over, or involvement in, the 13routine programmatic, licensing, funding, or certification 14operations of the Department. Nothing in this subsection 15limits investigations by the Department that may otherwise be 16required by law or that may be necessary in the Department's 17capacity as central administrative authority responsible for 18the operation of the State's mental health and developmental 19disabilities facilities.20    (g) Rulemaking authority. The Inspector General shall 21promulgate rules establishing minimum requirements for 22reporting allegations as well as for initiating, conducting, 23and completing investigations based upon the nature of the 24allegation or allegations. The rules shall clearly establish 25that if 2 or more State agencies could investigate an 26allegation, the Inspector General shall not conduct an   SB2987- 11 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1investigation that would be redundant to, or interfere with, 2an investigation conducted by another State agency. The rules 3shall further clarify the method and circumstances under which 4the Office of Inspector General may interact with the 5licensing, funding, or certification units of the Department 6in preventing further occurrences of mental abuse, physical 7abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, egregious neglect, financial 8exploitation, and material obstruction of an investigation.9    (g-5) Site visits and review authority.10        (1) Site visits. The Inspector General shall conduct 11    unannounced site visits to each facility at least annually 12    for the purpose of reviewing and making recommendations on 13    systemic issues relative to preventing, reporting, 14    investigating, and responding to all of the following: 15    mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, 16    egregious neglect, financial exploitation, or material 17    obstruction of an investigation.18        (2) Review authority. In response to complaints or 19    information gathered from investigations, the Inspector 20    General shall have and may exercise the authority to 21    initiate reviews of facilities and agencies related to 22    preventing, reporting, investigating, and responding to 23    all of the following: mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual 24    abuse, neglect, egregious neglect, financial exploitation, 25    or material obstruction of an investigation. Upon 26    concluding a review, the Inspector General shall issue a   SB2987- 12 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1    written report setting forth its conclusions and 2    recommendations. The report shall be distributed to the 3    Secretary and to the director of the facility or agency 4    that was the subject of review. Within 45 calendar days, 5    the facility or agency shall submit a written response 6    addressing the Inspector General's conclusions and 7    recommendations and, in a concise and reasoned manner, the 8    actions taken, if applicable, to: (i) protect the 9    individual or individuals; (ii) prevent recurrences; and 10    (iii) eliminate the problems identified. The response 11    shall include the implementation and completion dates of 12    such actions. 13    (h) Training programs. The Inspector General shall (i) 14establish a comprehensive program to ensure that every person 15authorized to conduct investigations receives ongoing training 16relative to investigation techniques, communication skills, 17and the appropriate means of interacting with persons 18receiving treatment for mental illness, developmental 19disability, or both mental illness and developmental 20disability, and (ii) establish and conduct periodic training 21programs for facility and agency employees concerning the 22prevention and reporting of any one or more of the following: 23mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, egregious 24neglect, financial exploitation, or material obstruction of an 25investigation. The Inspector General shall further ensure (i) 26every person authorized to conduct investigations at community   SB2987- 13 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1agencies receives ongoing training in Title 59, Parts 115, 2116, and 119 of the Illinois Administrative Code, and (ii) 3every person authorized to conduct investigations shall 4receive ongoing training in Title 59, Part 50 of the Illinois 5Administrative Code. Nothing in this Section shall be deemed 6to prevent the Office of Inspector General from conducting any 7other training as determined by the Inspector General to be 8necessary or helpful.9    (i) Duty to cooperate. 10        (1) The Inspector General shall at all times be 11    granted access to any facility or agency for the purpose 12    of investigating any allegation, conducting unannounced 13    site visits, monitoring compliance with a written 14    response, conducting reviews of facilities and agencies, 15    or completing any other statutorily assigned duty.16        (2) Any employee who fails to cooperate with an Office 17    of the Inspector General investigation is in violation of 18    this Act. Failure to cooperate with an investigation 19    includes, but is not limited to, any one or more of the 20    following: (i) creating and transmitting a false report to 21    the Office of the Inspector General hotline, (ii) 22    providing false information to an Office of the Inspector 23    General Investigator during an investigation, (iii) 24    colluding with other employees to cover up evidence, (iv) 25    colluding with other employees to provide false 26    information to the an Office of the Inspector General   SB2987- 14 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1    hotline or an investigator, (v) destroying evidence, (vi) 2    withholding evidence, (vii) influencing, threatening, or 3    impeding a victim's, complainant's, or required reporter's 4    report of an allegation to the hotline or witness 5    testimony during an investigation, or (viii) (vii) 6    otherwise obstructing a report to the an Office of the 7    Inspector General hotline or investigation. Additionally, 8    any employee who, during an unannounced site visit, 9    written response compliance check, or review fails to 10    cooperate with requests from the Office of the Inspector 11    General is in violation of this Act.12    (j) Subpoena powers. The Inspector General shall have the 13power to subpoena witnesses and compel the production of all 14documents and physical evidence relating to his or her 15investigations and reviews and any hearings authorized by this 16Act. This subpoena power shall not extend to persons or 17documents of a labor organization or its representatives 18insofar as the persons are acting in a representative capacity 19to an employee whose conduct is the subject of an 20investigation or the documents relate to that representation. 21Any person who otherwise fails to respond to a subpoena or who 22knowingly provides false information to the Office of the 23Inspector General by subpoena during an investigation is 24guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.25    (k) Reporting allegations and deaths.26        (1) Allegations. If an employee witnesses, is told of,   SB2987- 15 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1    or has reason to believe an incident of mental abuse, 2    physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, financial 3    exploitation, or material obstruction of an investigation 4    has occurred, the employee, agency, or facility shall 5    report the allegation by phone to the Office of the 6    Inspector General hotline according to the agency's or 7    facility's procedures, but in no event later than 4 hours 8    after the initial discovery of the incident, allegation, 9    or suspicion of any one or more of the following: mental 10    abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, financial 11    exploitation, or material obstruction of an investigation. 12    A required reporter as defined in subsection (b) of this 13    Section who knowingly or intentionally fails to comply 14    with these reporting requirements or who knowingly or 15    intentionally delays or withholds reports of allegations 16    for the purpose of obstructing an investigation is guilty 17    of a Class A misdemeanor.18        (2) Deaths. Absent an allegation, a required reporter 19    shall, within 24 hours after initial discovery, report by 20    phone to the Office of the Inspector General hotline each 21    of the following:22            (i) Any death of an individual occurring within 14 23        calendar days after discharge or transfer of the 24        individual from a residential program or facility.25            (ii) Any death of an individual occurring within 26        24 hours after deflection from a residential program   SB2987- 16 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1        or facility.2            (iii) Any other death of an individual occurring 3        at an agency or facility or at any Department-funded 4        site.5        (3) Retaliation. It is a violation of this Act for any 6    employee or administrator of an agency or facility to take 7    retaliatory action against an employee who acts in good 8    faith in conformance with his or her duties as a required 9    reporter. 10    (l) Reporting to law enforcement. Reporting criminal acts. 11Within 24 hours after determining that there is credible 12evidence indicating that a criminal act may have been 13committed or that special expertise may be required in an 14investigation, the Inspector General shall notify the Illinois 15State Police or other appropriate law enforcement authority, 16or ensure that such notification is made. The Illinois State 17Police shall investigate any report from a State-operated 18facility indicating a possible murder, sexual assault, or 19other felony by an employee. All investigations conducted by 20the Inspector General shall be conducted in a manner designed 21to ensure the preservation of evidence for possible use in a 22criminal prosecution. 23    (m) Investigative reports. Upon completion of an 24investigation, the Office of Inspector General shall issue an 25investigative report identifying whether the allegations are 26substantiated, unsubstantiated, or unfounded. Within 10   SB2987- 17 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1business days after the transmittal of a completed 2investigative report substantiating an allegation, finding an 3allegation is unsubstantiated, or if a recommendation is made, 4the Inspector General shall provide the investigative report 5on the case to the Secretary and to the director of the 6facility or agency where any one or more of the following 7occurred: mental abuse, physical abuse, sexual abuse, neglect, 8egregious neglect, financial exploitation, or material 9obstruction of an investigation. The director of the facility 10or agency shall be responsible for maintaining the 11confidentiality of the investigative report consistent with 12State and federal law. In a substantiated case, the 13investigative report shall include any mitigating or 14aggravating circumstances that were identified during the 15investigation. If the case involves substantiated neglect, the 16investigative report shall also state whether egregious 17neglect was found. An investigative report may also set forth 18recommendations. All investigative reports prepared by the 19Office of the Inspector General shall be considered 20confidential and shall not be released except as provided by 21the law of this State or as required under applicable federal 22law. Unsubstantiated and unfounded reports shall not be 23disclosed except as allowed under Section 6 of the Abused and 24Neglected Long Term Care Facility Residents Reporting Act. Raw 25data used to compile the investigative report shall not be 26subject to release unless required by law or a court order.   SB2987- 18 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1"Raw data used to compile the investigative report" includes, 2but is not limited to, any one or more of the following: the 3initial complaint, witness statements, photographs, 4investigator's notes, police reports, or incident reports. If 5the allegations are substantiated, the victim, the victim's 6guardian, and the accused shall be provided with a redacted 7copy of the investigative report. Death reports where there 8was no allegation of abuse or neglect shall only be released to 9the Secretary, or the Secretary's designee, and to the 10director of the facility or agency when a recommendation is 11made and pursuant to applicable State or federal law or a valid 12court order. Unredacted investigative reports, as well as raw 13data, may be shared with a local law enforcement entity, a 14State's Attorney's office, or a county coroner's office upon 15written request. Unredacted investigative reports, as well as 16raw data, may be shared with the Department of Financial and 17Professional Regulation when there is a substantiated finding 18against a person licensed by the Department of Financial and 19Professional Regulation who is within the Office of the 20Inspector General's jurisdiction, upon written request. If, 21during its investigation, the Office of the Inspector General 22found credible evidence of neglect by a person licensed by the 23Department of Financial and Professional Regulation who is not 24within the Office's jurisdiction, the Office may provide an 25unfounded or unsubstantiated investigative report or death 26report, as well as raw data, with the Department of Financial   SB2987- 19 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1and Professional Regulation, upon written request. 2    (n) Written responses, clarification requests, and 3reconsideration requests.4        (1) Written responses. Within 30 calendar days from 5    receipt of a substantiated investigative report or an 6    investigative report which contains recommendations, 7    absent a reconsideration request, the facility or agency 8    shall file a written response that addresses, in a concise 9    and reasoned manner, the actions taken to: (i) protect the 10    individual; (ii) prevent recurrences; and (iii) eliminate 11    the problems identified. The response shall include the 12    implementation and completion dates of such actions. If 13    the written response is not filed within the allotted 30 14    calendar day period, the Secretary, or the Secretary's 15    designee, shall determine the appropriate corrective 16    action to be taken.17        (2) Requests for clarification. The facility, agency, 18    victim or guardian, or the subject employee may request 19    that the Office of Inspector General clarify the finding 20    or findings for which clarification is sought. 21        (3) Requests for reconsideration. The facility, 22    agency, victim or guardian, or the subject employee may 23    request that the Office of the Inspector General 24    reconsider the finding or findings or the recommendations. 25    A request for reconsideration shall be subject to a 26    multi-layer review and shall include at least one reviewer   SB2987- 20 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1    who did not participate in the investigation or approval 2    of the original investigative report. After the 3    multi-layer review process has been completed, the 4    Inspector General shall make the final determination on 5    the reconsideration request. The investigation shall be 6    reopened if the reconsideration determination finds that 7    additional information is needed to complete the 8    investigative record.9    (o) Disclosure of the finding by the Inspector General. 10The Inspector General shall disclose the finding of an 11investigation to the following persons: (i) the Governor, (ii) 12the Secretary, (iii) the director of the facility or agency, 13(iv) the alleged victims and their guardians, (v) the 14complainant, and (vi) the accused. This information shall 15include whether the allegations were deemed substantiated, 16unsubstantiated, or unfounded.17    (p) Secretary review. Upon review of the Inspector 18General's investigative report and any agency's or facility's 19written response, the Secretary, or the Secretary's designee, 20shall accept or reject the written response and notify the 21Inspector General of that determination. The Secretary, or the 22Secretary's designee, may further direct that other 23administrative action be taken, including, but not limited to, 24any one or more of the following: (i) additional site visits, 25(ii) training, (iii) provision of technical assistance 26relative to administrative needs, licensure, or certification,   SB2987- 21 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1or (iv) the imposition of appropriate sanctions.2    (q) Action by facility or agency. Within 30 days of the 3date the Secretary, or the Secretary's designee, approves the 4written response or directs that further administrative action 5be taken, the facility or agency shall provide an 6implementation report to the Inspector General that provides 7the status of the action taken. The facility or agency shall be 8allowed an additional 30 days to send notice of completion of 9the action or to send an updated implementation report. If the 10action has not been completed within the additional 30-day 11period, the facility or agency shall send updated 12implementation reports every 60 days until completion. The 13Inspector General shall conduct a review of any implementation 14plan that takes more than 120 days after approval to complete, 15and shall monitor compliance through a random review of 16approved written responses, which may include, but are not 17limited to: (i) site visits, (ii) telephone contact, and (iii) 18requests for additional documentation evidencing compliance.19    (r) Sanctions. Sanctions, if imposed by the Secretary 20under Subdivision (p)(iv) of this Section, shall be designed 21to prevent further acts of mental abuse, physical abuse, 22sexual abuse, neglect, egregious neglect, or financial 23exploitation or some combination of one or more of those acts 24at a facility or agency, and may include any one or more of the 25following:26        (1) Appointment of on-site monitors.  SB2987- 22 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1        (2) Transfer or relocation of an individual or 2    individuals.3        (3) Closure of units.4        (4) Termination of any one or more of the following: 5    (i) Department licensing, (ii) funding, or (iii) 6    certification. 7    The Inspector General may seek the assistance of the 8Illinois Attorney General or the office of any State's 9Attorney in implementing sanctions. 10    (s) Health Care Worker Registry. 11        (1) Reporting to the Registry. The Inspector General 12    shall report to the Department of Public Health's Health 13    Care Worker Registry, a public registry, the identity and 14    finding of each employee of a facility or agency against 15    whom there is a final investigative report prepared by the 16    Office of the Inspector General containing a substantiated 17    allegation of physical or sexual abuse, financial 18    exploitation, egregious neglect of an individual, or 19    material obstruction of an investigation, unless the 20    Inspector General requests a stipulated disposition of the 21    investigative report that does not include the reporting 22    of the employee's name to the Health Care Worker Registry 23    and the Secretary of Human Services agrees with the 24    requested stipulated disposition. 25        (2) Notice to employee. Prior to reporting the name of 26    an employee, the employee shall be notified of the   SB2987- 23 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1    Department's obligation to report and shall be granted an 2    opportunity to request an administrative hearing, the sole 3    purpose of which is to determine if the substantiated 4    finding warrants reporting to the Registry. Notice to the 5    employee shall contain a clear and concise statement of 6    the grounds on which the report to the Registry is based, 7    offer the employee an opportunity for a hearing, and 8    identify the process for requesting such a hearing. Notice 9    is sufficient if provided by certified mail to the 10    employee's last known address. If the employee fails to 11    request a hearing within 30 days from the date of the 12    notice, the Inspector General shall report the name of the 13    employee to the Registry. Nothing in this subdivision 14    (s)(2) shall diminish or impair the rights of a person who 15    is a member of a collective bargaining unit under the 16    Illinois Public Labor Relations Act or under any other 17    federal labor statute. 18        (3) Registry hearings. If the employee requests an 19    administrative hearing, the employee shall be granted an 20    opportunity to appear before an administrative law judge 21    to present reasons why the employee's name should not be 22    reported to the Registry. The Department shall bear the 23    burden of presenting evidence that establishes, by a 24    preponderance of the evidence, that the substantiated 25    finding warrants reporting to the Registry. After 26    considering all the evidence presented, the administrative   SB2987- 24 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1    law judge shall make a recommendation to the Secretary as 2    to whether the substantiated finding warrants reporting 3    the name of the employee to the Registry. The Secretary 4    shall render the final decision. The Department and the 5    employee shall have the right to request that the 6    administrative law judge consider a stipulated disposition 7    of these proceedings.8        (4) Testimony at Registry hearings. A person who makes 9    a report or who investigates a report under this Act shall 10    testify fully in any judicial proceeding resulting from 11    such a report, as to any evidence of physical abuse, 12    sexual abuse, egregious neglect, financial exploitation, 13    or material obstruction of an investigation, or the cause 14    thereof. No evidence shall be excluded by reason of any 15    common law or statutory privilege relating to 16    communications between the alleged perpetrator of abuse or 17    neglect, or the individual alleged as the victim in the 18    report, and the person making or investigating the report. 19    Testimony at hearings is exempt from the confidentiality 20    requirements of subsection (f) of Section 10 of the Mental 21    Health and Developmental Disabilities Confidentiality Act.22        (5) Employee's rights to collateral action. No 23    reporting to the Registry shall occur and no hearing shall 24    be set or proceed if an employee notifies the Inspector 25    General in writing, including any supporting 26    documentation, that he or she is formally contesting an   SB2987- 25 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1    adverse employment action resulting from a substantiated 2    finding by complaint filed with the Illinois Civil Service 3    Commission, or which otherwise seeks to enforce the 4    employee's rights pursuant to any applicable collective 5    bargaining agreement. If an action taken by an employer 6    against an employee as a result of a finding of physical 7    abuse, sexual abuse, egregious neglect, financial 8    exploitation, or material obstruction of an investigation 9    is overturned through an action filed with the Illinois 10    Civil Service Commission or under any applicable 11    collective bargaining agreement and if that employee's 12    name has already been sent to the Registry, the employee's 13    name shall be removed from the Registry. 14        (6) Removal from Registry. At any time after the 15    report to the Registry, but no more than once in any 16    12-month period, an employee may petition the Department 17    in writing to remove his or her name from the Registry. 18    Upon receiving notice of such request, the Inspector 19    General shall conduct an investigation into the petition. 20    Upon receipt of such request, an administrative hearing 21    will be set by the Department. At the hearing, the 22    employee shall bear the burden of presenting evidence that 23    establishes, by a preponderance of the evidence, that 24    removal of the name from the Registry is in the public 25    interest. The parties may jointly request that the 26    administrative law judge consider a stipulated disposition   SB2987- 26 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1    of these proceedings. 2    (t) Review of Administrative Decisions. The Department 3shall preserve a record of all proceedings at any formal 4hearing conducted by the Department involving Health Care 5Worker Registry hearings. Final administrative decisions of 6the Department are subject to judicial review pursuant to 7provisions of the Administrative Review Law. 8    (u) Quality Care Board. There is created, within the 9Office of the Inspector General, a Quality Care Board to be 10composed of 7 members appointed by the Governor with the 11advice and consent of the Senate. One of the members shall be 12designated as chairman by the Governor. Of the initial 13appointments made by the Governor, 4 Board members shall each 14be appointed for a term of 4 years and 3 members shall each be 15appointed for a term of 2 years. Upon the expiration of each 16member's term, a successor shall be appointed for a term of 4 17years. In the case of a vacancy in the office of any member, 18the Governor shall appoint a successor for the remainder of 19the unexpired term.20    Members appointed by the Governor shall be qualified by 21professional knowledge or experience in the area of law, 22investigatory techniques, or in the area of care of the 23mentally ill or care of persons with developmental 24disabilities. Two members appointed by the Governor shall be 25persons with a disability or parents of persons with a 26disability. Members shall serve without compensation, but   SB2987- 27 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in connection with 2the performance of their duties as members.3    The Board shall meet quarterly, and may hold other 4meetings on the call of the chairman. Four members shall 5constitute a quorum allowing the Board to conduct its 6business. The Board may adopt rules and regulations it deems 7necessary to govern its own procedures.8    The Board shall monitor and oversee the operations, 9policies, and procedures of the Inspector General to ensure 10the prompt and thorough investigation of allegations of 11neglect and abuse. In fulfilling these responsibilities, the 12Board may do the following:13        (1) Provide independent, expert consultation to the 14    Inspector General on policies and protocols for 15    investigations of alleged abuse, neglect, or both abuse 16    and neglect.17        (2) Review existing regulations relating to the 18    operation of facilities.19        (3) Advise the Inspector General as to the content of 20    training activities authorized under this Section.21        (4) Recommend policies concerning methods for 22    improving the intergovernmental relationships between the 23    Office of the Inspector General and other State or federal 24    offices.25    (v) Annual report. The Inspector General shall provide to 26the General Assembly and the Governor, no later than January 1   SB2987- 28 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1of each year, a summary of reports and investigations made 2under this Act for the prior fiscal year with respect to 3individuals receiving mental health or developmental 4disabilities services. The report shall detail the imposition 5of sanctions, if any, and the final disposition of any 6corrective or administrative action directed by the Secretary. 7The summaries shall not contain any confidential or 8identifying information of any individual, but shall include 9objective data identifying any trends in the number of 10reported allegations, the timeliness of the Office of the 11Inspector General's investigations, and their disposition, for 12each facility and Department-wide, for the most recent 3-year 13time period. The report shall also identify, by facility, the 14staff-to-patient ratios taking account of direct care staff 15only. The report shall also include detailed recommended 16administrative actions and matters for consideration by the 17General Assembly.18    (w) Program audit. The Auditor General shall conduct a 19program audit of the Office of the Inspector General on an 20as-needed basis, as determined by the Auditor General. The 21audit shall specifically include the Inspector General's 22compliance with the Act and effectiveness in investigating 23reports of allegations occurring in any facility or agency. 24The Auditor General shall conduct the program audit according 25to the provisions of the Illinois State Auditing Act and shall 26report its findings to the General Assembly no later than   SB2987- 29 -LRB104 20368 KTG 33823 b1January 1 following the audit period.2    (x) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to mean 3that an individual is a victim of abuse or neglect because of 4health care services appropriately provided or not provided by 5health care professionals. 6    (y) Nothing in this Section shall require a facility, 7including its employees, agents, medical staff members, and 8health care professionals, to provide a service to an 9individual in contravention of that individual's stated or 10implied objection to the provision of that service on the 11ground that that service conflicts with the individual's 12religious beliefs or practices, nor shall the failure to 13provide a service to an individual be considered abuse under 14this Section if the individual has objected to the provision 15of that service based on his or her religious beliefs or 16practices. 17(Source: P.A. 103-76, eff. 6-9-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 18103-752, eff. 1-1-25; 104-270, eff. 8-15-25; revised 1912-12-25.)